Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8615
Rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement the purposes of the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 15.